Alaska statutes. Title 18. Health, Safety, Housing, Human Rights, and Public Defender.
Article 9. Safety Glazing.

Collateral references. —

39A C.J.S., Health and Environment, §§ 51 — 64, 71.

Sec. 18.60.750.
Labeling required.

Each lite of safety glazing material manufactured, distributed, imported, sold for use, or installed in hazardous locations in the state shall be permanently labeled by etching, sandblasting, firing of ceramic material, hot-die stamping, transparent pressure sensitive labels, or by other suitable means to ensure that the labeling will be permanent. The label must identify the manufacturer, fabricator, seller, or installer, the thickness and type of safety glazing material, and the fact that the material meets the test requirements of the American National Standards Institute Standard (ANSI Standard) Z-97.1-1972.

The label must be visible and legible after installation, and the label may not be used on other than safety glazing materials.

History.

(§ 1 ch 59 SLA 1974)

Sec. 18.60.755.
Safety glazing materials required.

A supplier, contractor, or installer, other than a private homeowner installing glazing material in an owner-occupied single dwelling, may not knowingly install, have installed, or consent to the installation of glazing materials other than safety glazing materials in a hazardous location.

Bid specifications for contracts for public buildings, public works, or other public improvements where the use of glazing material is required must include a provision that only safety glazing material that meets the test and labeling standards set out in AS

18.60.750

shall be used in the construction of public buildings, public works, or other public improvements under AS 35.10 and AS 35.15.

History.

(§ 1 ch 59 SLA 1974)

Sec. 18.60.760.
Employees not liable.

No liability under AS

18.60.750

—

18.60.755

is created as to workers who are employees of a material supplier, contractor, subcontractor, or other employer responsible for compliance with AS

18.60.750

—

18.60.755

.

History.

(§ 1 ch 59 SLA 1974)

Sec. 18.60.765.
Penalty.

A person who violates AS

18.60.750

—

18.60.755

is guilty of a misdemeanor, and upon conviction is punishable by a fine of not less than $500 nor more than $1,000 or by imprisonment for not more than one year, or by both.

History.

(§ 1 ch 59 SLA 1974)

Sec. 18.60.770.
Local ordinances.

Except where a city or borough ordinance is more strict in terms of the test and labeling standards for safety glazing material required or more broad in its application to persons or locations covered, AS

18.60.750

—

18.60.755

supersede a city or borough ordinance relating to safety glazing labels and materials.

History.

(§ 1 ch 59 SLA 1974)

Sec. 18.60.775.
Applicability. [Repealed, § 38 ch 30 SLA 1992.]

Sec. 18.60.780.
Definitions.

In AS

18.60.750

—

18.60.755

,

“bathtub enclosure” means a sliding, pivoting, or hinged door and fixed panels that are glazed or to be glazed and used to form a barrier between the bathtub and the rest of the bathroom area or other room in which bathing facilities are located;

“commercial buildings” means buildings including wholesale and retail stores and storerooms, and office buildings;

“commercial entrance and exit door” means a hinged, pivoting, revolving, or sliding door that is glazed or to be glazed and used alone or in combination with other doors, other than sliding glass door units, on interior or exterior walls of a commercial, public, or industrial building as a means of passage, ingress, or egress;

“fixed flat glazed panels immediately adjacent to entrance or exit doors” means the first fixed flat glazed panel on either or both sides of interior or exterior doors, 48 inches or less in width, the nearest vertical edge of which is located within six feet horizontally of the nearest vertical edge of the door;

“glazed” means the accomplished act of glazing;

“glazing” means the act of installing and securing glass or other glazing material into prepared openings in structural elements including doors, enclosures, and panels;

“hazardous locations” means those structural elements, glazed or to be glazed, in residential buildings and other structures used as dwellings, commercial buildings, industrial buildings, and public buildings, known as interior and exterior commercial entrance and exit doors and the immediately adjacent flat fixed glazed panels, sliding glass door units including the fixed glazed panels that are part of these units, storm or combination doors, shower and bathtub enclosures, primary residential entrance and exit doors and the fixed or operable adjacent sidelights, whether or not the glazing in these doors, panels, and enclosures is transparent; however, peep-holes or viewing devices are not hazardous locations;

“industrial buildings” means buildings including factories, manufacturing plants, or other auxiliary structures used in a manufacturing process;

“other structures used as dwellings” means buildings including mobile homes, manufactured or industrialized housing, and lodging homes;

“primary residential entrance and exit door” means a door, other than a sliding glass door unit, that is glazed or to be glazed and used in an exterior wall of a residential building and other structures used as dwellings, as a means of passage, ingress, or egress;

“public buildings” means buildings including hotels, hospitals, motels, dormitories, sanitariums, nursing homes, theaters, stadiums, gymnasiums, amusement park buildings, schools and other buildings used for educational purposes, museums, restaurants, bars, correctional institutions, places of worship, and other buildings of public accommodation or assembly;

“residential buildings” means structures including homes and apartments used as dwellings for one or more families or persons;

“safety glazing material” means any glazing material, including tempered glass, laminated glass, wire glass, or rigid plastic, that meets the test requirements of the American National Standards Institute Standard (ANSI Standard) Z-97.1-1972, and that is so constructed, treated, or combined with other materials as to minimize the likelihood of cutting and piercing injuries resulting from human contact with the glazing material;

“shower enclosure” means a hinged, pivoting, or sliding door and fixed panels that are glazed or to be glazed and used to form a barrier between the shower stall and the rest of the bathroom area or other room in which bathing facilities are located;

“sliding glass door units” means an assembly of glazed or to be glazed panels contained in an overall frame, installed in residential buildings and other structures used as dwellings, commercial, industrial, or public buildings, and so designed that one or more of the panels is movable in a horizontal direction to produce or close off an opening for use as a means of passage, ingress, or egress;

“storm or combination door” means a door that is glazed or to be glazed, and used in tandem with a primary residential or commercial entrance and exit door to protect the primary residential or commercial entrance or exit door against weather elements and to improve indoor climate control.

History.

(§ 1 ch 59 SLA 1974; am §§ 11 — 17 ch 9 SLA 2013)

Revisor’s notes. —

Reorganized in 1986 to alphabetize the defined terms.